Missouri, session 2026, HB2983.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 287.230, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 287.230, to read as follows:
287.230. 1. (1) The death of the injured employee shall not affect the liability of the
employer to furnish compensation as in this chapter provided, so far as the liability has
accrued and become payable at the time of the death, and any accrued and unpaid
compensation due the employee shall be paid to his or her dependents without
administration, or if there are no dependents, to his or her personal representative, a
family member as defined under this subsection, or other persons entitled thereto, but the
death shall be deemed to be the termination of the disability.
(2) For the purposes of this subsection, the term "family member" shall include
the adult child or children, natural, illegitimate, adopted, or posthumous, who did not
qualify as a dependent under section 287.240 due to age or dependency; a parent of the
deceased, natural or adoptive; a grandparent of the deceased, natural or adoptive; a
sibling of the deceased; an adult next of kin; or the conservator of a dependent child if
such child has no representative to bring a claim on his or her own behalf.
2. Where an employee is entitled to compensation under this chapter, exclusive of
compensation as provided for in section 287.200, for an injury received and death ensues for
any cause not resulting from the injury for which the employee was entitled to compensation,
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2983 2
payments of the unpaid unaccrued compensation under section 287.190 and no other
compensation for the injury shall be paid to the surviving dependents at the time of death.
3. In applying the provisions of this chapter, it is the intent of the legislature to reject
and abrogate the holding in Schoemehl v. Treasurer of the State of Missouri, 217 S.W.3d 900
(Mo. 2007), and all cases citing, interpreting, applying, or following this case.
✔